Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Article 7. Contributions.
§ 71-5-371.
Liability of sheriff for failure to execute warrant.

If any sheriff shall fail to return any warrant directed to him as herein provided on the return day thereof, the commission shall be entitled to recover judgment against the sheriff and the sureties on his official bond for the amount of the warrant and all costs, with lawful interest thereon until paid, together with ten per centum (10%) of the full amount thereof as damages, to be recovered by suit against the sheriff and his sureties by the commission. If any sheriff shall falsely make a nulla bona return on any warrant directed to him as herein provided, the commission shall be entitled to recover judgment against the sheriff and the sureties on his official bond for such amount as he could reasonably have made under such warrant and all costs, together with lawful interest thereon until paid, together with ten per centum (10%) thereon as damages, to be recovered by a suit against the sheriff and his sureties by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7427; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9e; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7e; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3e, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 71-5-373.
Defaulting employer.

An employer liable for contributions under the provisions of this chapter who fails to make and file his returns and reports as required, or who fails to pay any contributions when due under the provisions of this chapter, shall forfeit his right to do business in this state until he complies with all the provisions of this chapter and until he enters into a bond with sureties, to be approved by the commission, in an amount not to exceed all contributions estimated to become due by said employer under the provisions of this chapter for any three-month period, conditioned to comply with the provisions of this chapter, and to pay all contributions legally due or to become due by him. The commission may proceed by injunction to prevent the continuance of said business, and any temporary injunction enjoining the continuance of such business shall be granted without notice by any judge or chancellor now authorized by law to grant injunctions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7428; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9f; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7f; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3f, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 71-5-375.
Contributions a lien.

The contributions required by this chapter shall be a lien upon the property of any employer subject to its provisions who shall sell out his business or stock of goods, or who shall quit business, or whose property used or acquired in the business shall be sold under voluntary conveyance or under foreclosure, execution, attachment, distraint, or other judicial proceedings. Such employer shall, within ten (10) days before the happening of any of the above contingencies, be required to file such reports as the commission shall prescribe and to pay the contributions required by this chapter with respect to wages payable for employment up to the date of the happening of such contingency. The purchaser or successor in business shall withhold sufficient of the purchase money to cover the amount of contributions due and unpaid, until such time as such employer shall produce a receipt from the commission showing that the contributions have been paid or a certificate that no contributions are due. If such purchaser or successor shall fail to withhold purchase money as above provided, and the contributions shall not be paid within the ten (10) days specified above, such purchaser or successor shall be personally liable for the payment of the contributions accrued and unpaid on account of the operation of the business by the former owner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7429; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9g; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7g; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3g; Laws, 1983, ch. 362, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1983).

§ 71-5-377.
Priorities under legal dissolutions or distributions.

In the event of any distribution of an employer’s assets pursuant to an order of any court under the laws of this state, including any receivership, assignment for benefit of creditors, adjudicated insolvency, composition, or similar proceedings, contributions then or thereafter due shall be paid in full prior to all other claims except taxes, but on a parity with claims for wages of not more than Two Hundred and Fifty Dollars ($250.00) to each claimant, earned within six (6) months of the commencement of the proceedings. In the event of an employer’s adjudication in bankruptcy, judicially confirmed extension proposals, or composition under the Federal Bankruptcy Act of 1898, as amended, contributions then or thereafter due shall be entitled to such priority as is provided therein for taxes due and owing this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7430; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9h; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7h; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3h, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 71-5-379.
Collection by suit.

If, after due notice, an employer defaults in any payment of contributions or interest thereon, the amount due may be collected by civil action in the name of the commission, and this remedy shall be in addition to such other remedies as may be herein provided or otherwise provided by law. An employer adjudged in default shall pay the costs of such action. Civil actions brought under this section to collect contributions or interest thereon from an employer shall be heard by the court at the earliest possible date, and shall be entitled to preference upon the calendar of the court over all other civil actions except petitions for judicial review of claims for benefits under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7431; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9i; Laws, 1956, ch. 533, § 7i; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3k, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 71-5-381.
No injunction allowed to restrain collection.

No injunction shall be awarded by any court or judge to restrain the collection of contributions required by this chapter or to restrain the enforcement of this chapter. The provisions of section 11-13-11, shall not apply to contributions required by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7432; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9j; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7j; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3j, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 71-5-383.
Refunds.

The commission is authorized and empowered to refund, without interest, such contributions, interest, and penalties as it may determine were paid erroneously by an employer, or may make or authorize an adjustment thereof in connection with subsequent contribution payments, provided the employer shall make written application for such refund or adjustment within three (3) years to the last day of the calendar year in which the services of individuals in employment, with respect to which such contributions were erroneously paid, were performed. For like cause and within the same period, adjustment or refund may be made on the commission’s own initiative.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7433; Laws, 1940, ch. 295, § 12; Laws, 1948, ch. 412, § 9k; Laws, 1958, ch. 533, § 7k; Laws, 1968, ch. 561, § 3k, eff from and after July 1, 1968.

§ 71-5-385.
Requesting permission to file reports in special format; regulations; penalty.

Any employer may request permission to file unemployment compensation wage and contribution reports in a special format. If the request is approved by the commission, the employer must file the wage and contribution reports in accordance with regulations established by the commission. Failure to follow established regulations may result in a penalty of up to Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) each calendar quarter for each employer connected with the report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 491, § 3, eff from and after July 2, 1998.

§ 71-5-387.
Contributions to the unemployment compensation fund by certain Indian tribes under Federal Unemployment Tax Act.

Indian tribe(s) as defined in Section 3306(u) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (FUTA), which includes any subdivision, subsidiary or business enterprise wholly owned by such Indian tribe(s), subject to this chapter shall pay contributions under the same terms and conditions as all other subject employers, unless such Indian tribe elects to pay into the State Unemployment Fund amounts equal to the amount of benefits attributable to service in the employ of the Indian tribe.

Tribal unit(s) means any subdivision, subsidiary or business enterprise wholly owned by any Indian tribe as defined in Section 3306(u) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (FUTA) or any combination of any such subdivisions, subsidiaries or business enterprises wholly owned by such Indian tribe as defined in Section 3306(u) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (FUTA).

Indian tribes electing to make payments in lieu of contributions must make such election in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in Section 71-5-357 pertaining to nonprofit organizations subject to this chapter, except the tribe may determine if reimbursement for benefits paid will be elected by the tribe as a whole, by individual tribal units or by combinations of individual tribal units. Any tribal unit not making such election, shall pay contributions as described in Sections 71-5-351 through 71-5-355.

Payments in lieu of contributions shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Section 71-5-357.

Failure of the Indian tribe or tribal unit to post any bond as required by this chapter or to make payments in lieu of contributions if so elected by the tribe or tribal unit, as provided in subsection (3) of this section, including assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety (90) days of mailing or transmittal of the first delinquency notice to the last known address, shall cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions, as described in Section 71-5-357, for the following tax year, unless payment in full is received before January 1 of the next tax year.

Any Indian tribe that loses the option to make payments in lieu of contributions, as provided in subsection (5) of this section, may have such options reinstated if, after a period of one (1) year, all contributions have been made timely and no contributions, payments in lieu of contributions for benefits paid, penalties or interest remain unpaid.

Failure of the Indian tribe or any tribal unit thereof to make required payments, reimbursements or contributions whichever may apply, including assessments of interest and penalty, after all collection activities deemed necessary by the commission have been exhausted, may cause services performed for such tribe to not be treated as “employment” for purposes of Section 71-5-11.

If any Indian tribe fails to post any bond as required by this chapter or make payments required under this chapter, including contributions, reimbursements or assessments of interest and penalty, within ninety (90) days of the mailing or transmittal of a final notice, the commission shall immediately notify the United States Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of Labor.

The commission may determine that any Indian tribe that loses coverage under subsection (7) of this section, may again have services performed for such tribe included as “employment” for purposes of Section 71-5-11 if all contributions, payments in lieu of contributions, penalties and interest have been paid.

Notices of payment and reporting delinquency to any Indian tribe or tribal unit shall include information that failure to make full payment within the prescribed time frame:

Shall cause the Indian tribe to be liable for taxes under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (FUTA);

Shall cause the Indian tribe to lose the option to make payments in lieu of contributions;

May cause the Indian tribe to be excepted from the definition of “employer,” as provided in Section 71-5-11, and services in the employ of the Indian tribe, as provided in Section 71-5-11, to be excepted from “employment.”

Benefits based on service performed in employment with an Indian tribe as defined in Section 3306(u) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (FUTA), which includes any subdivision, subsidiary or business enterprise wholly owned by such Indian tribe, shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject to the same conditions, as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to this chapter.

Extended benefits paid that are attributable to service in the employ of an Indian tribe, and not reimbursed by the federal government, shall be financed in their entirety by such Indian tribe.

Any non-FUTA exclusions, that are by reference included in this section, shall not apply to Indian tribes if federal law requires coverage of such services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 562, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 71-5-389.
Setoff against tax refunds for debts owed to Mississippi Department of Employment Security; submission of debts to Department of Revenue; notice to debtor; transfer of funds to Department of Revenue; hearings; appeals; confidentiality.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the respective meanings ascribed by this section:

“Claimant agency” means the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.

“Debtor” means any individual, corporation or partnership owing money or having a delinquent account with any claimant agency, which obligation has not been adjudicated satisfied by court order, set aside by court order, or discharged in bankruptcy.

“Debt” means any sum due and owing any claimant agency, including costs, court costs, fines, penalties and interest which have accrued through contract, subrogation, tort, operation of law, or any other legal theory regardless of whether there is an outstanding judgment for that sum which is legally collectible and for which a collection effort has been or is being made.

“Department” or “Department of Revenue” means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi.

“Refund” means the Mississippi income tax refund which the department determines to be due any individual taxpayer, corporation or partnership.

The collection remedy authorized by this section is in addition to and is not substitution for any other remedy available by law.

A claimant agency may submit debts in excess of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) owed to it to the department for collection through setoff, under the procedure established by this section, except in cases where the validity of the debt is legitimately in dispute, an alternate means of collection is pending and believed to be adequate, or such collection would result in a loss of federal funds or federal assistance.

Upon the request of a claimant agency, the department shall set off any refund, as defined herein, against the sum certified by the claimant agency as provided in this section.

Within the time frame specified by the department, a claimant agency seeking to collect a debt through setoff shall supply the information necessary to identify each debtor whose refund is sought to be set off and certify the amount of debt or debts owed by each such debtor.

If a debtor identified by a claimant agency is determined by the department to be entitled to a refund of at least Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), the department shall transfer an amount equal to the refund owed, not to exceed the amount of the claimed debt certified, to the claimant agency. The Department of Revenue shall send the excess amount to the debtor within a reasonable time after such excess is determined. At the time of the transfer of funds to a claimant agency pursuant to this paragraph (b), the Department of Revenue shall notify the taxpayer or taxpayers whose refund is sought to be set off that the transfer has been made. Such notice shall clearly set forth the name of the debtor, the manner in which the debt arose, the amount of the claimed debt, the transfer of funds to the claimant agency pursuant to this paragraph (b) and the intention to set off the refund against the debt, the amount of the refund in excess of the claimed debt, the taxpayer’s opportunity to give written notice to contest the setoff within thirty (30) days of the date of mailing of the notice, the name and mailing address of the claimant agency to which the application for such a hearing must be sent, and the fact that the failure to apply for such a hearing, in writing, within the thirty-day period will be deemed a waiver of the opportunity to contest the setoff. In the case of a joint return or a joint refund, the notice shall also state the name of the taxpayer named in the return, if any, against whom no debt is claimed, the fact that a debt is not claimed against such taxpayer, the fact that such taxpayer is entitled to receive a refund if it is due him regardless of the debt asserted against his spouse, and that in order to obtain a refund due him such taxpayer must apply in writing for a hearing with the claimant agency named in the notice within thirty (30) days of the date of the mailing of the notice. If a taxpayer fails to apply in writing for such a hearing within thirty (30) days of the mailing of such notice, he will have waived his opportunity to contest the setoff.

Upon receipt of funds transferred from the Department of Revenue pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the claimant agency shall deposit and hold such funds in an escrow account until a final determination of the validity of the debt.

The claimant agency shall pay the Department of Revenue a fee, not to exceed Seventeen Dollars ($17.00) in each case in which a tax refund is identified as being available for offset. Such fees shall be deposited by the Department of Revenue into a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury, out of which the Legislature shall appropriate monies to defray expenses of the Department of Revenue in employing personnel to administer the provisions of this section.

When the claimant agency receives a protest or an application in writing from a taxpayer within thirty (30) days of the notice issued by the Department of Revenue, the claimant agency shall set a date to hear the protest and give notice to the taxpayer through the United States Postal Service or electronic digital transfer of the date so set. The time and place of such hearing shall be designated in such notice and the date set shall not be less than fifteen (15) days from the date of such notice. If, at the hearing, the sum asserted as due and owing is found not to be correct, an adjustment to the claim may be made. The claimant agency shall give notice to the debtor of its final determination as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection.

No issues shall be reconsidered at the hearing which have been previously litigated.

If any debtor is dissatisfied with the final determination made at the hearing by the claimant agency, he may appeal the final determination to the circuit court of the county in which the main office of the claimant agency is located by filing notice of appeal with the administrative head of the claimant agency and with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) days from the date the notice of final determination was given by the claimant agency.

Upon final determination of the amount of the debt due and owing by means of hearing or by the taxpayer’s default through failure to comply with timely request for review, the claimant agency shall remove the amount of the debt due and owing from the escrow account and credit such amount to the debtor’s obligation.

Upon transfer of the debt due and owing from the escrow account to the credit of the debtor’s account, the claimant agency shall notify the debtor in writing of the finalization of the setoff. Such notice shall include a final accounting if the refund which was set off, including the amount of the refund to which the debtor was entitled prior to the setoff, the amount of the debt due and owing, the amount of the collection fee paid to the Department of Revenue, the amount of the refund in excess of the debt which was returned to the debtor by the Department of Revenue, and the amount of the funds transferred to the claimant agency in excess of the debt determined to be due and owing at a hearing, if such a hearing was held. At such time, the claimant agency shall refund to the debtor the amount of the claimed debt originally certified and transferred to it by the Department of Revenue in excess of the amount of debt finally found to be due and owing.

Notwithstanding the provision that prohibits disclosure by the Department of Revenue of the contents of taxpayer records or information and notwithstanding any other confidentiality statute, the Department of Revenue may provide to a claimant agency all information necessary to accomplish and effectuate the intent of the section.

The information obtained by claimant agency from the Department of Revenue in accordance with the provisions of this section shall retain its confidentiality and shall only be used by a claimant agency in the pursuit of its debt collection duties and practices; and any employee or prior employee of any claimant agency who unlawfully discloses any such information for any other purpose, except as specifically authorized by law, shall be subject to the same penalties specified by law for unauthorized confidential information by an agent or employee of the Department of Revenue.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 400, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 138; Laws, 2013, ch. 309, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 2013).

§ 71-5-391.
Use of administrative funds for payment of fees associated with receipt of electronic payments.

The executive director of the department may use available administrative funds for payment of fees associated with receipt of electronic payments made to the department. In the event the fees are charged to an employer through a payment process external to the department, amounts not to exceed the charges for the electronic transaction may be credited to the employer and used as an offset to future indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 606, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.